Idaho, session 2025, H0449.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. In addition to any other appropriation provided by law,
there is hereby appropriated to the Public Schools Educational Support Pro-
gram's Division of Central Services $2,200,000 to be expended for operating
expenditures from the Public School Income Fund for the period July 1, 2025,
through June 30, 2026.
SECTION 2. There is hereby appropriated and the Office of the State Con-
troller shall transfer $2,200,000 from the General Fund to the Public School
Income Fund on July 1, 2025, or as soon thereafter as practicable for the pe-
riod July 1, 2025, through June 30, 2026.
SECTION 3. Of the additional amounts appropriated in Section 1 of this
act for the Public Schools Educational Support Program's Division of Central
Services $2,200,000 shall be considered expended from the General Fund for
the period July 1, 2025, through June 30, 2026.
SECTION 4. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2025.